Mississippi, session 2026, HB135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-20-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-20-7.  (1)  There is * * * hereby created an advisory council which shall be appointed by the State Health Officer, who shall serve at the pleasure of the State Health Officer. (2)  The advisory council shall consist of twelve (12) persons, * * *six (6) of whom shall be licensed child care providers, and six (6) of whom shall represent child care professional organizations, child advocacy groups, child care associations or state agencies which provide child care funding, education or services who shall be appointed based on recommendations from child care providers throughout the state. No more than four (4) members shall be appointed from any one (1) state Supreme Court district. (3)  It shall be the duty of the advisory council to assist and advise the licensing agency in the development of regulations governing the licensure and regulation of child care facilities and to advise the licensing agency on matters relative to the administration and interpretation of the provisions of this chapter. (4)  Members of the advisory council shall be reimbursed for mileage and expenses as is authorized by law. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.